apertium-ibo.ibo.lexd
# Separable
mụ:mụ         <pers><p1><sg>:         # "I, me, my"
mụ:m          <pers><p1><sg>:         # "I, me, my"  ! Dir/LR
gị:gị         <pers><p2><sg>:         # "you"
anyị:anyị     <pers><p1><pl>:         # "we, us, ours"
ụnụ:ụnụ       <pers><p2><pl>:         # "you, yours"
ya:ya         <pers><p3><sg>:         # "him, her, it"
ha:ha         <pers><p3><pl>:         # "they, their"

nke-m:nke-m   <pers><p1><sg><poss>:   # "my"
nke-gi:nke-gi <pers><p2><sg><poss>:   # "your, yours"

gịnị:gịnị           <itg>:          # "what"
onye:onye           <itg>:          # "who"
nkaa:nkaa           <dem><sg>:      # "that"
nke\ ahụ:nke\ ahụ   <dem><sg>:      # "that"
ahụ:ahụ             <dem><sg>:      # "that"
nke\ a:nke\ a       <dem><sg>:      # "this"
a:a                 <dem><sg>:      # "this"
ndị\ a:ndị\ a       <dem><pl>:      # "these"
ndị\ ahụ:ndị\ ahụ   <dem><pl>:      # "these"
ihe:ihe             <ind>:          # "something"
ihe-obula:ihe-obula <ind>:          # "everything, anything"
kachasị:kachasị     <ind>:          # "most"



#=============#
 LEXICON Verbs(2)
#=============#

iri:ri          <tv>   # "eat"
ibi:bi          <iv>   # "live"
ịga:ga          <iv>   # "walk"
#na-aga:na-aga   <iv>   # "walks"
ịza:za          <tv>   # "answer"
nọ:nọ           <iv>   # "is, are"
ịchọta:chọta    <tv>   # "find"
#chọtara:chọtara   # "found"
ịbụ:bụ          <iv>   # "be"
#bụ:bụ           <tv>   # "am"
dị:dị           <iv>   # "is"
inwe:nwe        <tv>   # "have, has"
ime:me          <tv>   # "make"
ikwu:kwu        <tv>   # "say"
#kwuo:kwuo       <tv>   # "says"
#kwuru:kwuru     <tv>   # "said"
ije:je          <iv>   # "go"
#gara:gara       <tv>  # "went"
ịma:ma          <tv>   # "know"
#maara:maara     <tv>  # "knows"
meriri:meriri    <iv>  # "won"
pụtara:pụtara   <tv>  # "mean"
ịhụ:hụ          <tv>   # "see"
nkuzi:nkuzi     <tv>   # "tutoring" 
ịbia:bia        <tv>   # "come"
iche:che        <tv>   # "think"
ine:ne          <tv>   # "look"
choo:choo       <tv>   # "want"
inye:nye        <tv>   # "give"
iji:ji          <tv>   # "use"
ịgwa:gwa        <tv>   # "tell"
ịjụ:jụ          <tv>   # "ask"
ịrụ:rụ          <tv>   # "work"
ịhapụ:hapụ      <iv>   # "leave"
ịkpọ:kpọ        <tv>   # "call"
ịchụ:chụ        <tv>   # "chase"
ide:de          <tv>   # "write"
ịgafe:gafe      <iv>   # "pass"
ịgba:gba        <iv>   # "dance"
ịgbachi:gbachi  <tv>   # "lock"
icheta:cheta    <tv>   # "remember"
ịkagbu:kagbu    <tv>   # "cancel"
ịnọdụ:nọdụ      <iv>   # "sit"
itu:tu          <tv>   # "throw" 
#eme:me          <tv>   # "does"
#na-eme:na-eme   <tv>   # "doing"
ime:me          <tv>   # "do"
#mere:mere       <tv>   # "did"
ịnwa:nwa        <tv>   # "try"
ibu:bu          <iv>   # "become"
ibido:bido      <tv>   # "start"
nwere\ ike:nwere\ ike     <tv>   # "can"  FIXME: CHECK
ịnụọ:nụọ        <tv>   # "drink"
ịnụ:nụ          <tv>   # "hear"
ịzaghachi:zaghachi        <tv>   # "reply"
ịhụrụ:hụrụ      <tv>   # "seen"
inweta:nweta    <tv>   # "get"
ịnọdụ:nọdụ      <iv>   # "sit"
ịhụnanya:hụnanya          <tv>   # "love"
mmasị:mmasị     <tv>   # "likes"
iche:che        <tv>   # "think"
iwere:were  	    <tv>   # "take"
nyere:nye     <tv>   # "given"
ịmalite:malite      <tv>   # "begin"
wepụtara:wepụtara  <iv>  # "released"
nwụrụ:nwụrụ     <iv>      # "died"
emepụta:emepụta  <iv>    # "produced"
ghọrọ:ghọrọ     <iv>      # "became"
akwado:kwado   <tv>     # "supported"
kwadoro:kwado  <tv>    # "supported"
hapụrụ:hapụrụ   <iv>   # "left"
sonyere:sonyere <tv>   # "joined"
ịgụ:gụ      <iv>    # "read"
inabata:nabata  <tv>   # "accept"
ikweta:kweta       <tv>    # "acknowledge"
imeghari:meghari   <tv>    # "adapt"
ịgbakwunye:gbakwunye  <iv>   # "add"
ikwere:kwere      <iv>    # "agree"
ikwusa:kwusa     <iv>   # "announce"
igosi:gosi     <iv>    # "show, indicate"
ịpụta:pụta     <tv>    # "mean"
itinye:tinye    <iv>   # "apply" 
ibili:bili      <iv>   # "arise 
ibịarute:bịarute   <tv>  # "arrive"
itinye:tinye     <iv>  # "attach
igbali:gbali     <iv>  # "attempt"
adọta:adọta     <tv>   # "attract"
izere:zere      <iv>    # "avoid"
iteta:iteta     <iv>   # "awake"
ịrịọ:rịọ          <tv>     # "beg"
ịfụ:fụ          <tv>   # "blow"
imebi:mebi    <iv>    # "spoil" 
ibiri:biri   <iv>    # "borrow"
ịbiaghachi:biaghachi    <iv>   # "return"
ịgbasa:gbasa     <iv>   # "spread"
ịzụta:zụta       <iv>    # "buy"
ịgbakọọ:gbakọọ    <tv>   # "calculate"
ilekọta:lekọta   <tv>   # "care"
ijide:jide    <iv>    # "catch"
ịhọrọ:họrọ    <tv>     # "choose"
ikwenye:kwenye    <iv>   # "confirm"
ịtụle:tụle      <tv>     # "consider"
ike:ike       <iv>     # "create"
ịkatọ:katọ     <tv>   # "criticize"
ikpebi:kpebi      <iv>  # "decide"
ịnapụta:napụta      <tv>   # "rescue"
ịgọnahụ:gọnahụ      <iv>    # "deny"
ịdabere:dabere    <iv>     # "depend"
ịkọwa:kọwa      <tv>    # "describe"
ibibi:ibibi     <iv>    # "destroy"
ịzụlite:ịzụlite     <tv>   # "develop"
ịchọpụta:chọpụta    <tv>   # "discover"
ịkwurita:kwurita   <iv>    # "discuss"
ikesaa:kesaa      <iv>   # "distribute"
ikpuru:kpuru      <iv>   # "drag" 
igwu:gwu          <iv>   # "drill"
ịkwọ:kwọ            <tv>     # "drive"
idebe:debe    <iv>   # "drop"
ịkpata:kpata        <tv>    # "earn"
ịkwalite:kwalite      <tv>  # "enhance"
ịbanye:banye       <tv>     # "enter"
ịnyocha:nyocha     <tv>    # "examine"
ibawanye:bawanye    <iv>   # "increase"
imeba:meba       <iv>     # "expand"
inwale:nwale     <iv>   # "experiment"
ịkọwa:kọwa    <tv>    # "explain"
ịgbatị:gbatị   <tv>    # "extend"
ida:da       <iv>    # "fail"
ịda:da   <tv>      # "fall"
imecha:mecha   <iv>  # "finish"
ịgbaso:gbaso     <tv>    # "follow"
igbochi:gbochi    <iv>   # "prevent"
ighe:ghe   <iv>    # "fry"
igbanye:gbanye    <iv>    # "ignition"
igwerie:gwerie    <iv>    # "grind"
ito:to     <iv>   # "grow"
ikowe:kowe    <iv>   # "hang"
iti:ti     <iv>     # "beat"
ịkpọgide:kpọgide    <tv>  # "crucify"
ịkụrụ:kụrụ     <tv>     # "hit"
ijigide:jigide     <iv>    # "hold"
ịmakụ:makụ     <tv>     # "hug"
ịmerụ:merụ     <tv>     # "hurt"
ịmata:mata    <tv>     # "identify"
ịgụnye:gụnye    <tv>    # "include"
igwa:gwa       <iv>    # "inform"
ịzube:zube    <tv>      # "intend"
iwebata:webata   <iv>   # introduce"
idebe:debe     <iv>    # "keep"
igba:gba       <iv>   # "kick"
idu:idu        <iv>    # "lead"
ịmụta:mụta     <tv>   # "learn"
ịdabere:dabere    <tv>  # "lean"
ibuli:buli      <iv>   # "lift"
ijikwa:jikwa     <iv>   # "manage"
Izukọ:zukọ       <tv>    # "meet"
igbazee:gbazee    <iv>   # "melt"
ịgwakọta:gwakọta     <tv>   # "mix"
imeghe:meghe          <iv>   # "open"
ịhazi:hazi      <iv>   # "organize"
ịyigharị:yigharị      <tv>    # "postpone"
ịwụpụ:wụpụ      <tv>    # "pour"
ichebe:chebe      <iv>    # "protect"
ịchụso:chụso       <tv>     # "pursue"
ịpị:pị                  <tv>    # "click"
ịkwụsị:kwụsị     <tv>      # "quit, stop"
ịghọta:ghọta   <tv>     # "realize"
ikwugharị:kwugharị     <tv>     # "repeat"
iweghachi:weghachi     <iv>    # "restore"
ikpoghachi:kpoghachi    <iv>     # "recall"
ichetaghachi:chetaghachi    <iv>   # "recollect"
ịjụ:jụ       <tv>    # "refuse"       
izuike:zuike      <iv>   # "relax"
ịrụkwa:rụkwa    <tv>   # "repair"
ịkwụghachi:kwụghachi   <tv>    # "repay"
idochi:dochi    <iv>     # "replace"
iguzogide:guzogide    <iv>     # "resist"
ihunoku:hunoku      <iv>      # "roast"
ịsachapụ:sachapụ      <tv>    # "scrub"
ire:re     <iv>   # "sell"
iziga:ziga     <iv>    # "send"
ijeozi:jeozi     <iv>    # "serve"
ịtọ:tọ  <tv>      # "set"
idozi:dozi   <iv>    # "settle"
ịkwanye:kwanye    <tv>   # "shake"
ịwụfu:wụfu    <tv>    # "shed"
imechi:mechi    <iv>    # "shut"
imikpu:mikpu     <iv>   # "submerge"
iberi:beri       <iv>    # "slice"
isi:si      <iv>      # "smell"
igwoura:gwoura     <iv>   # "snore"
ịsụpepe:sụpepe     <tv> # "spell"
imefu:mefu     <iv>   # "spend"
ịkwafu:kwafu    <tv>    # "spill"
iwukwudo:wukwudo     <iv>   # "squat"
iguzo:guzo       <iv>     # "stand"
ịrapara:rapara     <tv>    # "stick"
ikpalite:kpalite     <iv>    # "trigger"
ịkpali:kpali      <tv>   # "stir"
ibunye:bunye      <iv>   # "supply"
ịlanarị:lanarị       <tv>    # "survive"
iza:za        <iv>     # "sweep"
ikuzi:kuzi    <iv>    # "teach"
ịdọka:dọka    <tv>    # "tear"
inwendidi:nwendidi     <iv>   # "tolerate"
ịsụgharị:sụgharị     <tv>      # "translate"
ịghọta:ghọta     <tv>    # "understand"
iteta:teta       <iv>     # "wake"
ichere:chere    <iv>   # "wait"
ịsa:sa       <tv>     # "wash"
ifegharị:fegharị       <iv>    # "wave"
iyi:yi       <iv>     # "wear"
imetụta:metụta      <iv>    # "affect" 

#======================#
 LEXICON Compound-Verbs(3)
#======================#

ịchị\ ọchị:chị       ọchị         <tv>   # "laugh"
ịge\ ntị:ge           ntị          <tv>   # "listen"
igwu\ egwu:gwu        egwu         <iv>   # "play"
igba\ oso:gba         oso          <iv>   # "run"
ọnọ\ ọgụgụ:ọnọ        ọgụgụ        <tv>   # "count"
inye\ ndụmọdụ:nye  ndụmọdụ      <tv>   # "advise"
ibo\ ebubo:bo ebubo  <iv> # "accuse"
ikwu\ okwu:kwu    okwu      <iv>   # "speak"
ịrịọ\ mgbaghara:rịọ mgbaghara    <tv>   # "apologize"
ikwe\ nkwa:kwe nkwa            <iv>    # "promise"
isa\ ahu:isa ahu       <iv>   # "bathe"
ịsọ\ mpi:sọ mpi     <tv>   # "compete"
inwe\ nchegbu:inwe nchegbu   <iv>  # "concern"
iti\ mkpu:ti mkpu        <iv>    # "shout"
ibe\ akwa:be kwa       <iv>   # "cry"
igbu\ oge:gbu oge        <iv>     # "delay"
ịrọ\ nrọ:rọ nrọ       <tv>    # "dream"
ịkpọrọ\ nkụ:kpọrọ nkụ    <tv>     # "dry"
ịgba\ ume:gba ume        <tv>    # "encourage"
itinye\ aka:tinye aka    <iv>    # "engage"
ịdị\ adị:dị adị   <tv>      # "exist"
ịtụ\ anya:tụ anya    <tv>     # "expect"
inwe\ mmetụta:nwe mmetụta  <iv>   # "feel"
ife\ efe:fe efe          <iv>    # "fly"
ịkpọ\ asị:kpọ asị       <tv>   # "hate"
izo\ ezo:zo ezo    <iv>    # "hide"
iwuli\ elu:wuli elu   <iv>    # "hop"
ima\ elu:ma elu     <iv>     # "jump"
inwe\ olileanya:nwe olileanya    <iv>    # "hope"
isi\ onwu:si onwu             <iv>   # "insist"
ime\ atụmatụ:me atụmatụ       <tv>    # "plan"
ịtụrụ\ ime:tụrụ ime         <tv>   # "conceive"
itinye\ ego:tinye ego       <iv>    # "invest"
isusu\ onu:susu onu      <iv>     # "kiss"
ileru\ anya:leru anya        <iv>    # "observe" 
igbu\ ikpere:gbu ikpere   <iv>     # "kneel"
ịgha\ ụgha:gha ụgha      <tv>    # "lie"
itu\ ukwu:tu ukwu       <iv>    # "leap"
ibinye\ ego:binye ego   <iv>    # "lend"
ịwa\ ọkụ:wa ọkụ            <tv>     # "light"
ileghara\ anya:leghara anya    <iv>   # "neglct"
ịkwụ\ ụgwọ:kwụ ụgwọ      <tv>       # "pay"
iso\ nso:so nso       <iv>      # "forbid"
ịkụ\ ọkpọ:kụ ọkpọ     <tv>       # "punch"
imeghachi\ omume:meghachi omume   <iv>     # "react"
ịtụgharị\ uche:tụgharị uche     <tv>     # "reflect"
ịnọchite\ anya:nọchite anya     <tv>    # "represent"
ịjuo\ afọ:juo afọ    <iv>       # "satisfy"
ịkwa\ akwa:kwa akwa    <tv>    # "sew"
ihi\ ụra:hi ụra      <tv>     # "sleep"
ịgha\ mkpụrụ:gha mkpụrụ    <tv>   # "sow"
ịgbụọpụ\ ọnụ:gbụọpụ ọnụ     <tv>   # "spit"
izu\ ohi:zu ohi       <iv>      # "steal"
isi\ isi:si isi    <iv>     # "stink"
igu\ akwukwo:gu akwukwo    <iv>   # "study"
ịta\ ahụhụ:ta ahụhụ    <tv>    # "suffer"
ịtụ\ aro:tụ aro   <tv>     # "suggest"
igwu\ mmiri:gwu mmiri     <iv>   # "swim"
iyi\ egwu:yi egwu     <iv>     # "threaten"
ịkụ\ nzọ:kụ nzọ        <tv>     # "bet"


#=================#
 LEXICON Adjectives
#=================#
